New Mexico, session 2026, HB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Health Care Purchasing Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] FIREFIGHTER CANCER SCREENINGS.-- A. A firefighter covered by group health coverage, including self-insurance, offered, issued, amended, delivered or renewed under the Health Care Purchasing Act shall be entitled to receive preventive cancer screening in accordance with the latest screening guidelines issued by the international association of firefighters. Cancer screening covered pursuant to this section shall not be subject to cost sharing. B. For the purposes of this section: (1) "cost sharing" means policy deductibles, copayments or coinsurance; and (2) "firefighter" means any member of a fire department that is part of or administered by the state or any political subdivision of the state." - 2 -